Idaho statutes. Title 53 PARTNERSHIP
Chapter 3
UNIFORM PARTNERSHIP ACT

Part 1. General Provisions

Sec.

Part 2. Nature of Partnership

Part 3. Relations of Partners to Persons Dealing with Partnership

Part 4. Relations of Partners to Each Other and to Partnership

Part 5. Transferees and Creditors of Partner

Part 6. Partner’s Dissociation

Part 7. Partner’s Dissociation When Business not Wound Up

Part 8. Winding Up Partnership Business

Part 9. Conversions and Mergers

Part 10. Limited Liability Partnership

53-3-1001 — 53-3-1003A. [Repealed.]

Part 11. Foreign Limited Liability Partnership

Part 12. Miscellaneous Provisions